Wisconsin, session 2025, AB840.
do enact as follows:AB840,11Section 1. 196.20 (10) of the statutes is created to read:AB840,2,32196.20 (10) (a) In this subsection, “data center” means a facility having a 3primary purpose of storing, managing, and processing digital data.AB840,2,74(b) The commission shall ensure in rate-making orders that no costs 5associated with the construction or extension of electric infrastructure that 6primarily serves the load of a data center are allocated to or recovered from any 7other customer.AB840,28Section 2. 196.492 of the statutes is created to read:AB840,2,109196.492 Location of renewable energy facilities serving data centers. 10(1) Definitions. In this section:AB840,2,1211(a) “Data center” means a facility having a primary purpose of storing, 12managing, and processing digital data.AB840,2,1313(b) “Renewable energy” has the meaning given in s. 196.378 (1) (fg).AB840,2,1514(c) “Renewable energy facility” means an electric generating facility that 15generates renewable energy.AB840,2,1716(2) Location requirement. Any renewable energy facility that primarily 17serves the load of a data center shall be located at the site of the data center.AB840,318Section 3. 299.70 of the statutes is created to read:AB840,2,1919299.70 Data centers. (1) Definitions. In this section:AB840,3,21(a) “Closed-loop cooling system” means a system for removing heat from 2equipment and that relies on a fixed volume of water that is continually recycled.AB840,3,43(b) “Data center” means a facility having a primary purpose of storing, 4managing, and processing digital data.AB840,3,75(2) Water usage. (a) A data center may not be constructed or operated in 6this state unless water used by the data center for cooling purposes is contained in 7a closed-loop cooling system.AB840,3,108(b) A person may not operate a data center in this state unless the person 9annually reports to the department the total amount of water used by the data 10center for the 12-month period prior to submitting the report.AB840,3,1711(3) Bonds and other security. (a) A person may not operate a data center 12in this state unless the person files with the department a bond furnished by a 13surety company licensed to do business in this state. In lieu of a bond, the person 14may deposit cash, certificates of deposit, or government securities with the 15department. Interest received on certificates of deposit and government securities 16shall be paid to the person. The amount of the bond or other security required shall 17be equal to the estimated cost of fulfilling the reclamation required under sub. (4).AB840,3,2018(b) Upon approval of the person’s bond or other security under par. (a), the 19department shall issue written authorization to commence construction of a data 20center.AB840,4,221(4) Reclamation. If construction of a proposed data center is not completed, 22the owner shall notify the department and commence restoring the parcel on which 1construction was begun. The owner shall restore the parcel, to the greatest extent 2feasible, to the condition that existed prior to any construction on the data center.AB840,4,33